src/fst/morphology/incoming/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
LEXICON yii-PROG-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@áá    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #;

LEXICON yii-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@áá    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #;

LEXICON yii-PROG-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@áá    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #;


!
! yi-POT
!
LEXICON yi-POT

@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yi@@D.PREFIX@          yi-POT-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yi@@R.PREFIX.INNER@    yi-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yi@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@   yi-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yi@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@    yi-POT-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yis@@D.PREFIX@         yis-POT-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yis@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   yis-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yis@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  yis-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yis@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   yis-POT-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yii@@D.PREFIX@         yii-POT-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yii@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   yii-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yii@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  yii-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yii@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   yii-POT-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON yi-POT-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yi    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@í     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #;

LEXICON yi-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@í     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #;

LEXICON yi-POT-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yi    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@í     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #;


LEXICON yis-POT-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ís    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;

LEXICON yis-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ís    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;

LEXICON yis-POT-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ís    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;


LEXICON yii-POT-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@íí    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@íí    #;

LEXICON yii-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@íí    #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@íí    #;  
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@íí    #;  

LEXICON yii-POT-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@íí    #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@íí    #; 


!
! ì-IPFV
!
LEXICON i-IPFV

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.i@@D.PREFIX@          i-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.i@@R.PREFIX.INNER@    i-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.i@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@   i-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.i@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@    i-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.is@@D.PREFIX@         is-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.is@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   is-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.is@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  is-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.is@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   is-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ii@@D.PREFIX@         ii-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ii@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   ii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ii@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  ii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ii@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   ii-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON i-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@àS    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ì     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;

LEXICON i-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@àS    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ì     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;

LEXICON i-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@aS    #; ! CHECK: morphophonology works?
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ì     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;


LEXICON is-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@àS    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;

LEXICON is-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@àS    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;

LEXICON is-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
! TODO: 2S, 3S, 3P, and 4 forms need to be reviewed
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #; ! CHECK: morphophonology works?
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@aS    #; ! CHECK: morphophonology works? 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ì     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;


LEXICON ii-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@àS    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìì    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #;

LEXICON ii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@àS    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìì    #;  
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #;  

LEXICON ii-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@íí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #; ! CHECK: morphophonology OK?
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@aS    #; ! CHECK: morphophonology OK? 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìì    #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #; 


!
! ì-si-PFV
!
LEXICON isi-PFV

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.isi@@D.PREFIX@          isi-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.isi@@R.PREFIX.INNER@    isi-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.isi@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@   isi-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.isi@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@    isi-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.isis@@D.PREFIX@         isis-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.isis@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   isis-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.isis@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  isis-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.isis@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   isis-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.isii@@D.PREFIX@         isii-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.isii@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   isii-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.isii@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  isii-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.isii@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   isii-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;
